Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-723
Multicultural education; rules and regulations.

The State Department of Education shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 79-719 to 79-722.

Laws 1992, LB 922, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,233;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 397.